Utah statutes.
13-24-6.   Preservation of secrecy.
In an action under this chapter, a court shall preserve the secrecy of an
alleged trade secret by reasonable means, which may include granting
protective orders in connection with discovery proceedings, holding in-camera
hearings, sealing the records of the action, and ordering any person involved
in the litigation not to disclose an alleged trade secret without prior court
approval.
